Utah statutes.
67-18-5.   Confidential, private, or protected documents excepted.

The right to examine and copy documents in an employee's personnel file is subject to access provisions in Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

